Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-205 Rate review: request by
aggrieved party. (a) Any person aggrieved by the application as to such
person of any classification, rule, standard, rate, or rating plan made,
followed, or adopted by an insurer may make written request to the commissioner
to review such application and grant the relief requested. If the commissioner
finds that probable cause for the complaint exists or that the complaint
charges a violation of this article or any applicable provision of article 14,
the commissioner shall conduct a hearing on the complaint. The hearing shall
be subject to the procedure provided in section 431:14-118.

(b) If, after a hearing conducted pursuant to
subsection (a), the commissioner finds that the complainant is entitled to
relief or that any classification, rule, standard, rate, rating territory, or
rating plan violates this article or any applicable provisions of article 14,
the commissioner shall issue an order granting the complainant's claim for
relief or prohibiting the insurer from using such classification, rule,
standard, rate, rating territory, or rating plan. The order shall contain the
commissioner's findings of fact and conclusions of law, including a
specification of the respects in which a violation of this article or article
14 exists and specifying a reasonable time period within which the insurer
shall comply with the terms of the order. Any such order shall be subject to
judicial review in the manner provided in chapter 91. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next